Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,110
Costs; how paid; termination of registry; when.

Costs associated with administration of the Parkinson's Disease Registry Act shall be paid from cash funds, contract receipts, gifts, and grants. No general funds shall be used to pay such costs. Funds received by the department for the payment of such costs shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. Notwithstanding any other provision of the act, the Parkinson's Disease Registry and all duties related to the administration of such registry and such act shall cease as of June 30 of any year in which the department has insufficient funds on hand to perform its duties under the act for the next fiscal year, after providing thirty days' written notice to each approved researcher who has contracted with the department under section 81-6,101 in the current biennium.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 18;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 751.